Utah statutes.
76-8-802.   Destruction of property to interfere with preparation for
defense or war.
Whoever intentionally destroys, impairs, injures, interferes, or tampers with
real or personal property with reasonable grounds to believe that the act will
hinder, delay, or interfere with the preparation of the United States or of
any of the states for defense or for war, or with the prosecution of war by
the United States, shall be guilty of a felony of the second degree.
